Tennessee statutes. Title 35 Fiduciaries And Trust Estates
Part 2

Uniform Prudent Management of Institutional Funds Act

35-10-201. Short title.

This part shall be known and may be cited as the “Uniform Prudent Management of Institutional Funds Act.”

Acts 2007, ch. 186, § 1.

Law Reviews.

Symposium: The Role of Federal Law in Private Wealth Transfer: Strange Bedfellows: The Federal Constitution, Out-of-State Nongrantor Accumulation Trusts, and the Complete Avoidance of State Income Taxation, 67 Vand. L. Rev. 1945 (2014).

35-10-202. Part definitions.

As used in this part, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Charitable purpose” means the relief of poverty, the advancement of education or religion, the promotion of health, the promotion of a governmental purpose, or any other purpose the achievement of which is beneficial to the community;

“Endowment fund” means an institutional fund or part thereof that, under the terms of a gift instrument, is not wholly expendable by the institution on a current basis. The term does not include assets that an institution designates as an endowment fund for its own use;

“Gift instrument” means a record or records, including an institutional solicitation, under which property is granted to, transferred to, or held by an institution as an institutional fund;

“Institution” means:

A person, other than an individual, organized and operated exclusively for charitable purposes;

A government or governmental subdivision, agency, or instrumentality, to the extent that it holds funds exclusively for a charitable purpose; and

A trust that had both charitable and noncharitable interests, after all noncharitable interests have terminated;

“Institutional fund” means a fund held by an institution exclusively for charitable purposes. “Institutional fund” does not include:

Program-related assets;

A fund held for an institution by a trustee that is not an institution; or

A fund in which a beneficiary that is not an institution has an interest, other than an interest that could arise upon violation or failure of the purposes of the fund;

“Person” means an individual, corporation, business trust, estate, trust, partnership, limited liability company, association, joint venture, public corporation, government or governmental subdivision, agency, or instrumentality, or any other legal or commercial entity;

“Program-related asset” means an asset held by an institution primarily to accomplish a charitable purpose of the institution and not primarily for investment; and

“Record” means information that is inscribed on a tangible medium or that is stored in an electronic or other medium and is retrievable in perceivable form.

Acts 2007, ch. 186, § 2.

Law Reviews.

Symposium: The Role of Federal Law in Private Wealth Transfer: Comment, Federalizing Principles of Donative Intent and Unanticipated Circumstances, 67 Vand. L. Rev. 1931 (2014).

35-10-203. Standard of conduct in managing and investing institutional fund.

Subject to the intent of a donor expressed in a gift instrument, an institution, in managing and investing an institutional fund, shall consider the charitable purposes of the institution and the purposes of the institutional fund.

In addition to complying with the duty of loyalty imposed by law other than this part, each person responsible for managing and investing an institutional fund shall manage and invest the fund in good faith and with the care an ordinarily prudent person in a like position would exercise under similar circumstances.

In managing and investing an institutional fund, an institution:

May incur only costs that are appropriate and reasonable in relation to the assets, the purposes of the institution, and the skills available to the institution; and

Shall make a reasonable effort to verify facts relevant to the management and investment of the fund.

An institution may pool two (2) or more institutional funds for purposes of management and investment.

Except as otherwise provided by a gift instrument, the following rules apply:

In managing and investing an institutional fund, the following factors, if relevant, must be considered:

General economic conditions;

The possible effect of inflation or deflation;

The expected tax consequences, if any, of investment decisions or strategies;

The role that each investment or course of action plays within the overall investment portfolio of the fund;

The expected total return from income and the appreciation of investments;

Other resources of the institution;

The needs of the institution and the fund to make distributions and to preserve capital; and

An asset's special relationship or special value, if any, to the charitable purposes of the institution;

Management and investment decisions about an individual asset must be made not in isolation but rather in the context of the institutional fund's portfolio of investments as a whole and as a part of an overall investment strategy having risk and return objectives reasonably suited to the fund and to the institution;

Except as otherwise provided by law other than this part, an institution may invest in any kind of property or type of investment consistent with this section;

An institution shall diversify the investments of an institutional fund unless the institution reasonably determines that, because of special circumstances, the purposes of the fund are better served without diversification;

Within a reasonable time after receiving property, an institution shall make and carry out decisions concerning the retention or disposition of the property or to rebalance a portfolio, in order to bring the institutional fund into compliance with the purposes, terms, distribution requirements, and other circumstances of the institution and the requirements of this part; and

A person that has special skills or expertise, or is selected in reliance upon the person's representation that the person has special skills or expertise, has a duty to use those skills or that expertise in managing and investing institutional funds.

Acts 2007, ch. 186, § 3.

35-10-204. Appropriation for expenditure or accumulation of endowment fund — Rules of construction.

Subject to the intent of a donor expressed in the gift instrument and to subsection (d), an institution may appropriate for expenditure or accumulate so much of an endowment fund as the institution determines is prudent for the uses, benefits, purposes, and duration for which the endowment fund is established. Unless stated otherwise in the gift instrument, the assets in an endowment fund are donor-restricted assets until appropriated for expenditure by the institution. In making a determination to appropriate or accumulate, the institution shall act in good faith, with the care that an ordinarily prudent person in a like position would exercise under similar circumstances, and shall consider, if relevant, the following factors:

The duration and preservation of the endowment fund;

The purposes of the institution and the endowment fund;

General economic conditions;

The possible effect of inflation or deflation;

The expected total return from income and the appreciation of investments;

Other resources of the institution; and

The investment policy of the institution.

To limit the authority to appropriate for expenditure or accumulate under subsection (a), a gift instrument must specifically state the limitation.

Terms in a gift instrument designating a gift as an endowment, or a direction or authorization in the gift instrument to use only “income”, “interest”, “dividends”, or “rents, issues, or profits”, or “to preserve the principal intact”, or words of similar import:

Create an endowment fund of permanent duration unless other language in the gift instrument limits the duration or purpose of the fund; and

Do not otherwise limit the authority to appropriate for expenditure or accumulate under subsection (a).

The appropriation for expenditure in any year of an amount greater than seven percent (7%) of the fair market value of an endowment fund, calculated on the basis of market values determined at least quarterly and averaged over a period of not less than three (3) years immediately preceding the year in which the appropriation for expenditure was made, creates a rebuttable presumption of imprudence.

For an endowment fund in existence for fewer than three (3) years, the fair market value of the endowment fund must be calculated for the period the endowment fund has been in existence.

This subsection (d) does not:

Apply to an appropriation for expenditure permitted under law other than this part or by the gift instrument; or

Create a presumption of prudence for an appropriation for expenditure of an amount less than or equal to seven (7%) percent of the fair market value of the endowment fund.

Acts 2007, ch. 186, § 4.

35-10-205. Delegation of management and investment functions.

Subject to any specific limitation set forth in a gift instrument or in law other than this part, an institution may delegate to an external agent the management and investment of an institutional fund to the extent that an institution could prudently delegate under the circumstances. An institution shall act in good faith, with the care that an ordinarily prudent person in a like position would exercise under similar circumstances, in:

Selecting an agent;

Establishing the scope and terms of the delegation, consistent with the purposes of the institution and the institutional fund; and

Periodically reviewing the agent's actions in order to monitor the agent's performance and compliance with the scope and terms of the delegation.

In performing a delegated function, an agent owes a duty to the institution to exercise reasonable care to comply with the scope and terms of the delegation.

An institution that complies with subsection (a) is not liable for the decisions or actions of an agent to which the function was delegated.

By accepting delegation of a management or investment function from an institution that is subject to the laws of this state, an agent submits to the jurisdiction of the courts of this state in all proceedings arising from or related to the delegation or the performance of the delegated function.

An institution may delegate management and investment functions to its committees, officers, or employees as authorized by law of this state other than this part.

Acts 2007, ch. 186, § 5.

35-10-206. Release or modification of restrictions on management, investment, or purpose.

If the donor consents in a record, an institution may release or modify, in whole or in part, a restriction contained in a gift instrument on the management, investment, or purpose of an institutional fund. A release or modification may not allow a fund to be used for a purpose other than a charitable purpose of the institution.

The court, upon application of an institution, may modify a restriction contained in a gift instrument regarding the management or investment of an institutional fund if the restriction has become impracticable or wasteful, if it impairs the management or investment of the fund, or if, because of circumstances not anticipated by the donor, a modification of a restriction will further the purposes of the fund. The institution shall notify the attorney general and reporter of the application, and the attorney general and reporter must be given an opportunity to be heard. To the extent practicable, any modification must be made in accordance with the donor's probable intention.

If a particular charitable purpose or a restriction contained in a gift instrument on the use of an institutional fund becomes unlawful, impracticable, impossible to achieve, or wasteful, the court, upon application of an institution, may modify the purpose of the fund or the restriction on the use of the fund in a manner consistent with the charitable purposes expressed in the gift instrument. The institution shall notify the attorney general and reporter of the application, and the attorney general and reporter must be given an opportunity to be heard.

If an institution determines that a restriction contained in a gift instrument on the management, investment, or purpose of an institutional fund is unlawful, impracticable, impossible to achieve, or wasteful, the institution, sixty (60) days after notification to the attorney general and reporter, may release or modify the restriction, in whole or part, if:

The institutional fund subject to the restriction has a total value of less than one hundred fifty thousand dollars ($150,000). This dollar limit shall increase by an amount of five thousand dollars ($5,000) on July 1, 2011, and on each July 1 in subsequent years;

More than twenty (20) years have elapsed since the fund was established; and

The institution uses the property in a manner consistent with the charitable purposes expressed in the gift instrument.

Acts 2007, ch. 186, § 6; 2010, ch. 639, § 1.

35-10-207. Reviewing compliance.

Compliance with this part is determined in light of the facts and circumstances existing at the time a decision is made or action is taken, and not by hindsight.

Acts 2007, ch. 186, § 7.

35-10-208. Application to existing institutional funds.

This part applies to institutional funds existing on or established after July 1, 2007. As applied to institutional funds existing on July 1, 2007, this part governs only decisions made or actions taken on or after July 1, 2007.

Acts 2007, ch. 186, § 8.

35-10-209. Relation to Electronic Signatures in Global and National Commerce Act.

This part modifies, limits, and supersedes the Electronic Signatures in Global and National Commerce Act (15 U.S.C. § 7001 et seq.), but does not modify, limit, or supersede § 101 of that act (15 U.S.C. § 7001(a)), or authorize electronic delivery of any of the notices described in § 103 of that act (15 U.S.C. § 7003(b)).

Acts 2007, ch. 186, § 9.

35-10-210. Uniformity of application and construction.

In applying and construing the uniform act set out in this part, consideration must be given to the need to promote uniformity of the law with respect to its subject matter among states that enact it.

Acts 2007, ch. 186, § 10.